netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
    <pardef n="ab_su">
        <e><p><l>su</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_si">
        <e><p><l>si</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_Si">
        <e><p><l>Si</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_SI">
        <e><p><l>SI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_Su">
        <e><p><l>Su</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_Ra">
        <e><p><l>Ra</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ve">
        <e><p><l>ve</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ri">
        <e><p><l>ri</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ru">
        <e><p><l>ru</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_pI">
        <e><p><l>pI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ra">
        <e><p><l>ra</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_Sa">
        <e><p><l>Sa</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_xU">
        <e><p><l>xU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_mu">
        <e><p><l>mu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_pu">
        <e><p><l>pu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_lu">
        <e><p><l>lu</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_wI">
        <e><p><l>wI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_mU">
        <e><p><l>mU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_li">
        <e><p><l>li</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_rI">
        <e><p><l>rI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_pU">
        <e><p><l>pU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_lU">
        <e><p><l>lU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_nI">
        <e><p><l>nI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_rU">
        <e><p><l>rU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_yI">
        <e><p><l>yI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_di">
        <e><p><l>di</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ta">
        <e><p><l>ta</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_ti">
        <e><p><l>ti</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_tI">
        <e><p><l>tI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_bU">
        <e><p><l>bU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_SU">
        <e><p><l>SU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_sI">
        <e><p><l>sI</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_sU">
        <e><p><l>sU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_na">
        <e><p><l>na</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ab_yU">
        <e><p><l>yU</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- MODIFIERS -->

    <pardef n="mr_a_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>a</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_a_e">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>a</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_a_o">
        <e><p><l>o</l><r>a</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_a">
        <e><p><l></l><r>a</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_av_O">
        <e><p><l>O</l><r>av</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ma_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_A_a">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>A</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_A_e">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>A</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_A_i">
        <e><p><l>i</l><r>A</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_A_I">
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>A</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_A">
        <e><p><l></l><r>A</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_i_a">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_i_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_i_I">
        <e><p><l>I</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_i_e">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_i_E">
        <e><p><l>E</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_i_ay">
        <e><p><l>ay</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_i_Ay">
        <e><p><l>Ay</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_i_iy">
        <e><p><l>iy</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_i_y">
        <e><p><l>y</l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_i">
        <e><p><l></l><r>i</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_I_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_I_i">
        <e><p><l>i</l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_I_e">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_I_E">
        <e><p><l>E</l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_I_ay">
        <e><p><l>ay</l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_I_Ay">
        <e><p><l>Ay</l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_I_iy">
        <e><p><l>iy</l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_I_y">
        <e><p><l>y</l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_I">
        <e><p><l></l><r>I</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_u_a">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_u_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_u_U">
        <e><p><l>U</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_u_O">
        <e><p><l>O</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_u_av">
        <e><p><l>av</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_u_uv">
        <e><p><l>uv</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_u_Uv">
        <e><p><l>Uv</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_U_u">
        <e><p><l>u</l><r>U</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_U_o">
        <e><p><l>o</l><r>U</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_U_O">
        <e><p><l>O</l><r>U</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_U_a">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>U</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_U_av">
        <e><p><l>av</l><r>U</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_U_A">
        <e><p><l>A</l><r>U</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_U_Av">
        <e><p><l>Av</l><r>U</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_U_uv">
        <e><p><l>uv</l><r>U</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_U">
        <e><p><l></l><r>U</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_u_Av">
        <e><p><l>Av</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_u_o">
        <e><p><l>o</l><r>u</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_L">
        <e><p><l>L</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_ar">
        <e><p><l>ar</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_Ar">
        <e><p><l>Ar</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_al">
        <e><p><l>al</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_Ir">
        <e><p><l>Ir</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_ur">
        <e><p><l>ur</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_r">
        <e><p><l>r</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_ra">
        <e><p><l>ra</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_rA">
        <e><p><l>rA</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_ri">
        <e><p><l>ri</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_q_riy">
        <e><p><l>riy</l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_q">
        <e><p><l></l><r>q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="md_qj">
        <e><p><l></l><r>qj</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Q_q">
        <e><p><l>q</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Q_ar">
        <e><p><l>ar</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Q_al">
        <e><p><l>al</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Q_Ar">
        <e><p><l>Ar</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Q_Al">
        <e><p><l>Al</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mr_Q_ir">
        <e><p><l>ir</l><r>Q</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gA2"><i>g</i><par n="mr_A_I"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lat_yak_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="ciri1"><i>cir</i><par n="mr_i_I"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lot_yak_svAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="SAs1"><par n="at_a"/><i>S</i><par n="mr_A_i"/><par n="mr_s_R"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_laf_yak_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="rahi1"><i>ra</i><par n="ma_M"/><i>h</i><par n="md_i"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lat_yak_curAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="mi1"><i>m</i><par n="mr_i_A"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_R_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="kRi2"><i>kR</i><par n="mr_i_Ay"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_svAxi_iw"/></e>
    <e lm="mI2"><i>m</i><par n="mr_I_A"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lut_krm_kryAxi_w"/></e>
    <e lm="rI2"><i>r</i><par n="mr_I_e"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="kRI1"><i>kR</i><par n="mr_I_Ay"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="ci2"><i>c</i><par n="mr_i_a"/><par n="ma_p"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR_iN_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="ci2"><i>c</i><par n="mr_i_ay"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="vah1"><i>v</i><par n="mr_a_o"/><par n="md_h"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lut_krm_BvAxi_D"/></e>
    <e lm="cil1"><par n="at_a"/><i>c</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><i>l</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_wuxAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="gal2"><par n="at_a"/><i>g</i><par n="mr_a_A"/><i>l</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqf_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="swoma1"><i>swom</i><par n="md_a"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_curAxi_iR_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="Rvakv1"><par n="ab_Ra"/><par n="mr_R_s"/><i>vakv</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="RTiv1"><par n="ab_ti"/><i>RTiv</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="NakR1"><par n="ab_na"/><par n="mr_N_n"/><i>akR</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="tval1"><par n="ab_ta"/><i>tval</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="ret1"><par n="ab_ri"/><i>ret</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Sri1"><par n="ab_Si"/><p><l>Sr</l><r>Sri</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_iy"/></e>
    <e lm="Su1"><par n="ab_Su"/><p><l>S</l><r>Su</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_u"/></e>
    <e lm="u1"><par n="mr_u_Uv"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="SyE1"><par n="ab_Sa"/><i>Sy</i><par n="md_E"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_A_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="SAn1"><par n="ab_SI"/><i>SA</i><par n="mr_n_M"/><par n="ma_s"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_BvAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="rA1"><par n="ab_ra"/><i>r</i><par n="md_A"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="vevI1"><i>vev</i><par n="mr_I_y"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_axAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="BI1"><par n="ab_bi"/><i>B</i><par n="mr_I_ay"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_juhowyAxi_Am"/></e>
    <e lm="rAX1"><par n="ab_ra"/><i>rAX</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="Sak2"><i>S</i><par n="mr_a_e"/><i>k</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="muh1"><par n="ab_mu"/><i>muh</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="Rnuh1"><par n="ab_su"/><i>R</i><par n="mr_n_N"/><i>uh</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="Rnih1"><par n="ab_si"/><i>R</i><par n="mr_n_N"/><i>ih</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="ruR2"><par n="ab_ru"/><i>ruR</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="dip1"><par n="ab_di"/><i>dip</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="luB1"><par n="ab_lu"/><i>luB</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lit_krm_xivAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="rAX2"><i>r</i><par n="mr_A_e"/><i>X</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_svAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="sPut3"><par n="ab_pu"/><i>sPut</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lit_krm_wuxAxi"/></e>
    <e lm="lI2"><par n="ab_li"/><p><l>l</l><r>lI</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lit_krm_kryAxi_i"/></e>
